Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-1-101. Prohibition against center pivot irrigation discharge on interstate.

It is unlawful for a person, sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation that engages in irrigation of any farm or agricultural lands to intentionally permit or cause any center pivot irrigation water to be discharged onto the traveled portion of any interstate or state highway.

A first violation of this section shall cause a warning to be issued.

Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, the offender shall be guilty of a violation and punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the discharge of center pivot irrigation waters onto an interstate or state highway resulted from winds of such intensity that no mechanical device that is intended to prevent spray from reaching the roadway could have prevented the spraying or that the discharge resulted from excessive rainfall that contributed to flooding of the roadway.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, the offender shall be guilty of a violation and punished” for “A second or subsequent offense shall be punishable” in (b)(2).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Agricultural Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 403.

Science-based practices supported by research; and

The use of technology that is demonstrated to lead to broad, outcomes-based performance improvements that:

Meet the needs of the present; and

Improve the ability of future generations to meet their needs while advancing progress toward environmental, social, and economic goals and the well-being of agricultural producers and rural communities.

Sustainable agriculture may use continuous improvement principles with goals that include without limitation:

Enhancing agricultural and surrounding environments, including without limitation water, soil, and air quality, biodiversity, and habitat preservation.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “federal rule or” in (c)(1); and substituted “state rules or federal rules or regulations” for “rules or regulations” in (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (c)(1).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Effective Dates. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Young and Beginning Farmer Advisory Board, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §2. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-1-201. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1; 2009, No. 543, § 1.

2-1-202. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 1.

2-1-203. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1; 2007, No. 672, § 1.

2-1-204. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1; 2007, No. 672, § 1.

2-1-205. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1.

2-1-206. Acts 2003, No. 1760, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Act 2019, No. 501,§ 2, provided: “Severability Clause. If any provision of this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared severable.”

Publisher's Notes. See also §25-38-203(b), added by Acts 2019, No. 741, § 2, whichconcerns labeling ofhorticultural, viticultural, livestock, and poultry products that are edible by humans and provides for civil penalties.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1753, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 2.

2-1-102. Sustainable agriculture — Definition.

As used in this section, “sustainable” includes without limitation:

Increasing agricultural productivity;

Improving human health through access to safe, nutritious, and affordable food; and

(1)The Department of Agriculture and the State Plant Board shall interpret any administrative rule or federal rule or regulation promulgated by a state or federal agency that establishes standards for harvesting or producing agricultural crops in accordance with the definition and guidelines provided in this section.

This section does not apply to silviculture and any state rules or federal rules or regulations regarding silviculture.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1196, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 9.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Young and Beginning Farmer Advisory Board

2-1-201 — 2-1-206. [Repealed.]

2-1-301. Legislative purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to protect consumers from being misled or confused by false or misleading labeling of agricultural products that are edible by humans.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

2-1-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agricultural product” means a horticultural, viticultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, or bee product or any other farm, ranch, plantation, or range product;

“Beef” means the flesh of a domesticated bovine, such as a steer or cow, that is edible by humans;

“Beef product” means an agricultural product that is edible by humans and produced in whole or in part from beef, including without limitation beef jerky, beef patties, chopped beef, fabricated steak, hamburger, ground beef, ribs, and roast;

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container or wrapper in which an agricultural product that is edible by humans is offered for direct retail sale;

“Labeling” means the act of identifying, describing, or advertising an agricultural product that is edible by humans by means of the label or through other means;

“Livestock” means swine, bovines, sheep, and goats;

“Meat” means a portion of a livestock, poultry, or cervid carcass that is edible by humans.

“Meat” does not include a:

Synthetic product derived from a plant, insect, or other source; or

Product grown in a laboratory from animal cells;

“Meat product” means an agricultural product that is edible by humans and made wholly or in part from meat or another portion of a livestock, poultry, or cervid carcass;

“Misbrand” means to identify an agricultural product edible by humans in a false or misleading way;

“Misrepresent” means to use any untrue, misleading, or deceptive oral or written statement, advertising, label, display, picture, illustration, or sample;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, corporation, firm, company, or other entity doing business in Arkansas;

“Pork” means the flesh of a domesticated swine that is edible by humans;

“Pork product” means an agricultural product that is edible by humans and produced in whole or in part from pork, including without limitation bacon, bratwurst, ground pork, ham, pork chops, ribs, roast, and sausage;

“Poultry” means domestic birds that are edible by humans; and

“Rice” means the whole, broken, or ground kernels or by-products obtained from the species Oryza sativa L. or Oryza glaberrima, or wild rice, which is obtained from one (1) of the four (4) species of grasses from the genus Zizania or Porteresia.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

2-1-303. Applicability.

This subchapter applies only to a person that places a label on an agricultural product that is edible by humans.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

2-1-304. Administration.

The Director of the Arkansas Bureau of Standards shall:

Administer and enforce this subchapter;

Promulgate rules to implement the purposes and requirements of this subchapter; and

Receive and investigate complaints regarding alleged violations of this subchapter and the rules promulgated by the director.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

2-1-305. Prohibited activities.

A person shall not misbrand or misrepresent an agricultural product that is edible by humans, including without limitation by:

Affixing a label that is false or misleading;

Selling the agricultural product under the name of another food;

Omitting information required under § 20-56-209 from the label;

Placing information on the label in a way that does not conform with the requirements under § 20-56-209;

Representing the agricultural product as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been provided by regulations under § 20-56-219 or by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2019, unless:

The agricultural product conforms to the definition and standard; and

The label of the agricultural product bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard and includes the common names of optional ingredients other than spices, flavoring, and coloring present in the food as regulations require;

Representing the agricultural product as meat or a meat product when the agricultural product is not derived from harvested livestock, poultry, or cervids;

Representing the agricultural product as rice when the agricultural product is not rice;

Representing the agricultural product as beef or a beef product when the agricultural product is not derived from a domesticated bovine;

Representing the agricultural product as pork or a pork product when the agricultural product is not derived from a domesticated swine;

Utilizing a term that is the same as or similar to a term that has been used or defined historically in reference to a specific agricultural product; or

Affixing a label that uses a variation of rice in the name of the agricultural product when the agricultural product is not rice or derived from rice.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

2-1-306. Civil penalty.

A person that violates § 2-1-305 shall be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

Each item that violates § 2-1-305 constitutes a separate violation subject to the civil penalty provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

A person subject to a civil penalty under subsection (a) of this section may request an administrative hearing within ten (10) calendar days after receipt of the notice of the penalty.

Upon request, the Director of the Arkansas Bureau of Standards shall conduct a hearing after giving appropriate notice to the person, and the decision of the director is subject to appropriate judicial review.

If a person subject to a civil penalty under subsection (a) of this section has exhausted all administrative appeals and the civil penalty has been upheld, the person or entity shall pay the civil penalty within twenty (20) calendar days after the effective date of the final decision.

If the person fails to pay the civil penalty as required under this section, a civil action may be brought by the director in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the civil penalty.

A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund.

The director may waive a civil penalty for a violation of § 2-1-305 if:

He or she determines that the violation was accidental, erroneous, or unintentional; or

The person that violated § 2-1-305 publicly acknowledges the violation and issues a voluntary recall for the mislabeled products.

Cross References. Wildlife causing crop damage, §15-44-114.

Am. Jur. 18 Am. Jur. 2d, Coop. Asso., § 1 et seq.

Ark. L. Notes.

Matthews, Agricultural Cooperatives in Arkansas — Abuse of Discretion in Retiring Equity, 1985 Ark. L. Notes 79.

Ark. L. Rev.

Organization of Agricultural Marketing Cooperatives, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 173.

Fee and Hoberg, Potential Liability of Directors of Agricultural Cooperatives, 37 Ark. L. Rev. 60.

C.J.S. 3 C.J.S., Agri., § 169 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Mathews, Corporate Statutes — Which One Applies?, 13 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 83.

Cross References. Cooperative associations, §4-30-101 et seq.

Liability of cooperatives for torts, §4-30-118.

Taxation exemption of receipts from sale of certain agricultural products, §26-52-405.

Effective Dates. Acts 1963, No. 90, § 2: Feb. 27, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that newly established regulations of the federal government are working undue hardships on a number of cooperatives organized under the laws of this state; that such hardships are the result of existing provisions of laws of this state governing such cooperatives; and, that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to make the needed changes in the laws governing such cooperatives in order to remove such hardships. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 311, § 3: Mar. 24, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that additional revenues will be needed during the next biennium to maintain the present level of state services; that thousands of dollars are being lost in revenues to this state through special exemptions and exclusions contained in the various tax laws of this state; and that in order to remove these exemptions and exclusions and thereby increase the revenues from such sources, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Cited: Jefferson Coop. Gin, Inc. v. Milam, 255 Ark. 479, 500 S.W.2d 932 (1973); Conway County Farmers Ass'n v. United States, 588 F.2d 592 (8th Cir. 1978).

Cited: Two Bros. Farm v. Riceland Foods, Inc., 57 Ark. App. 25, 940 S.W.2d 889 (1997).

History.

Acts 2019, No. 501, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Truth in Labeling of Agricultural Products Edible by Humans